Hawaii statutes.
§19-6 Misdemeanors. The following
persons shall be guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Any person who offers any bribe or makes any
promise of gain, or with knowledge of the same permits any person to offer any
bribe or make any promise of gain for the person's benefit to any voter to
induce the voter to sign a nomination paper, and any person who accepts any
bribe or promise of gain of any kind as consideration for signing the same,
whether the bribe or promise of gain be offered or accepted before or after the
signing;

(2) Any person who wilfully tears down or destroys or
defaces any election proclamation or any poster or notice or list of voters or
visual aids or facsimile ballot, issued or posted by authority of law;

(3) Any person printing or duplicating or causing to
be printed or duplicated any ballot, conforming as to the size, weight, shape,
thickness, or color to the official ballot so that it could be cast or counted
as an official ballot in an election;

(4) Every person who is disorderly or creates a
disturbance whereby any meeting of the precinct officials or the board of
registration of voters during an election is disturbed or interfered with; or
whereby any person who intends to be lawfully present at any meeting or
election is prevented from attending; or who causes any disturbance at any
election; and every person assisting or aiding or abetting any disturbance;

(5) Every person who, either in person or through
another, in any manner breaks up or prevents, or endeavors to break up or
prevent, the holding of any meeting of the board of registration of voters, or
in any manner breaks up or prevents, or endeavors to break up or prevent, the
holding of any election;

(6) Any person, other than those designated by
section 11-132, who remains or loiters within the area set aside for voting as
set forth in section 11-132 during the time appointed for voting;

(7) Any person, including candidates carrying on any
campaign activities within the area described in section 11-132 during the
period of time starting one hour before the polling place opens and ending when
the polling place closes for the purpose of influencing votes. Campaign
activities shall include the following:

(A) Any distribution, circulation, carrying,
holding, posting, or staking of campaign cards, pamphlets, posters and other
literature;

(B) The use of public address systems and
other public communication media;

(C) The use of motor caravans or parades; and

(D) The use of entertainment troupes or the
free distribution of goods and services;

(8) Any person who opens a return envelope containing
an absentee ballot voted under chapter 15 other than those authorized to do so
under chapter 15;

(9) Any unauthorized person found in possession of
any voting machine or keys thereof;

(10) Every person who wilfully violates or fails to
obey any of the provisions of law, punishment for which is not otherwise in
this chapter specially provided for. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217,
§8; am L 1974, c 34, §5(b); am L 1975, c 36, §6 and c 146, §2(b); am L 1976, c
106, §5; am L 1980, c 264, §7; am L 1989, c 121, §2; am L 1990, c 115, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

Precludes "exit polling" within a polling place and
within a thousand-foot radius thereof. Att. Gen. Op. 84-4.

Case Notes

Par. 7: Activity of poll watchers in recording names of
those who have voted is not proscribed by section; constitutionality of section
questioned but not decided. 54 H. 254, 506 P.2d 13.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next